Massachusetts, session 194th, H3644.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the inspector general shall
conduct an audit and investigation into Keolis Commuter Services, LLC’s performance under
commuter rail operating agreement contract no. 159-12 with the Massachusetts Bay
Transportation Authority. The audit and investigation shall include, but not be limited to, an
examination of: (i) Keolis’ compliance with the representations set forth in its proposal; (ii)
Keolis’ compliance with its performance and other obligations under the operating agreement,
including its obligations under any remedial plan or remedial agreement; (iii) Keolis’ compliance
with its financial obligations and covenants to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority
under contract no. 159-12; and (iv) any relief, or waiver, of Keolis’ obligations under contract
no. 159-12 granted by the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority and the basis for such
of 2

relief or waiver. The inspector general shall submit a report detailing the finding of the
investigation and recommendations to the secretary of transportation, secretary of administration
and finance, general manager of the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority and the chairs
of the Joint Committee on Transportation within 90 days from the date hereof.
of 2